Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 24.1 The Rhode Island Autism Spectrum Disorder Education Act

16-24.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Autism Spectrum Disorder Education Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

16-24.1-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

Autism is a neurobiological, developmental disorder that is defined by behavioral and development features.

Autism is best characterized as a spectrum of disorders that vary in severity of symptoms, age of onset and association with other disorders (e.g. mental retardation, specific language delay, epilepsy) and are unique in their pattern of deficits and areas of relative strengths. They generally have lifelong effects on how children learn to be social beings, to care for themselves, and to participate in the community.

The incidence of autism has dramatically increased. In 1992, one in ten thousand (10,000) children were diagnosed with “ASD”, yet currently one in one hundred fifty (150) children have this disorder.

Children and youth with Autism Spectrum Disorders (ASD) offer unique challenges to families, teachers and others who work with them, particularly with nonverbal and verbal communication and behavior problems.

Medical and psychological experts still do not know the causes of “ASD”, prevention of “ASD” or unified strategies dealing with children and adults afflicted with such disorder.

Education, both directly of children and youth, and of parents and teachers, is currently the primary form of treatment for Autism Spectrum Disorders (ASD).

The education of children and youth with ASD is accepted as a public responsibility. However, goals, methods and resources available vary greatly from school system to school system, school to school, and class to class.

Education is defined as the fostering of the acquisition of skills or knowledge- including not only academic learning, but also socialization, adaptive skills, language and communication, and reduction of behavior problems to assist the child to develop independence and social responsibility.

“ASD” exacts an enormous economic toll on society, including the public school system and family finances.

The Autism Society of America estimates that the lifetime cost of caring for a child with autism ranges from three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) to five million dollars ($5,000,000), and that the United States is facing almost ninety billion dollars ($90,000,000,000) annually in costs for autism.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

16-24.1-3.
Legislative purpose and policy.

It shall be the goal and purpose of this act to promote the early diagnosis of ASD and therapeutic strategies for treatment and assistance to individuals with autism. The state of Rhode Island must take the lead in combating the increasingly rapid problems associated with “ASD” and the current treatments and strategies. It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this chapter to reinforce screening for children who are uninsured and/or underinsured through the Rhode Island department of health with assistance from experts, service providers and parents. It is the further intent of the general assembly, subject to appropriation and/or the receipt of other resources designated for these purposes, to authorize the Rhode Island department of health to provide appropriate testing and screening models to determine a proper diagnosis of “ASD” and to create a case management system to properly catalogue such diagnosis. In addition, subject to appropriation and/or the receipt of other resources designated for these purposes, this chapter shall authorize programs of outreach, education, increased awareness and cultural competence to the statewide community.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 201, § 2.

16-24.1-4.
Implementation.

To implement the state’s autism public policies, the following steps should be taken:

The department of health shall develop a coordinated plan for collecting prevalence data and reporting it;

The department of human services shall continue to raise public awareness especially among families regarding the need for early intervention and how to access it;

The department of human services shall continue its current practice, to raise awareness of early intervention providers and families for earlier assessment and intervention;

The department of human services will increase the capacity and improve consistency of early intervention programs and providers;

The department of education shall develop a “Needs Assessment Document” to perform a random sampling in the public schools to differentiate between what student needs are being met and what needs are not being met. This information will be used to identify how needs are currently being met and how that information can be used to develop a way to meet the unmet needs; identify ways the existing system could be modified to support the unmet needs;

The department of education in conjunction with Rhode IslandCollege shall produce a series of instructional modules that could be embedded into existing pre-service courses in multi-disciplines; and

The department of education in conjunction with Rhode Island College shall develop a continuing education certificate in autism spectrum disorders at Rhode Island College (to be offered jointly with Salve Regina University and the University of Rhode Island).

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 201, § 2.